Mississippi, session 2026, HB1629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 49-11-22, Mississippi Code of 1972: 49-11-22. (1)  It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly enter a shooting preserve or commercial wildlife enclosure without the permission of, or without being accompanied by, the operator or owner of the preserve or enclosure, or the agent of operator or owner of the preserve or enclosure, to kill, maim, wound or capture any exotic livestock contained within the preserve or enclosure. (2) Any person convicted of violating subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of willful or malicious trespass, and upon conviction, shall be fined not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned not longer than six (6) months in the county jail, or both in accordance with Section 97-17-87(1). (3) In addition to any fine or penalty assessed due to a violation of this section, a person convicted of violating subsection (1) of this section who unlawfully kills, maims, wounds or captures any exotic livestock while trespassing, is guilty of a Class I violation and shall be punished in accordance as provided in Section 49-7-141(1). (4) In addition to any fine or penalty assessed due to a violation of this section, a person convicted of violating subsection (1) of this section who unlawfully kills, maims, wounds or captures any exotic livestock while trespassing, shall make restitution to the operator and owner of the enclosure for each exotic animal killed, maimed, wounded or captured.  The measure for restitution in money shall be the current replacement value of such loss and/or the actual veterinarian fees, special supplies, loss of income and other costs incurred as a result of the violation.  The total amount of restitution authorized by this paragraph shall be paid to the landowner. (5) In addition to any fine or penalty assessed due to a violation of this section, a person convicted of violating subsection (1) of this section shall be civilly liable for any damage caused to structure of the shooting preserve or commercial wildlife enclosure when gaining entry thereto. SECTION 2.  Section 49-11-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-11-1. For purposes of this chapter: (a) "Commission" means the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. (b) "Department" means the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. (c) "Operator" means a person licensed to operate a shooting preserve or a commercial wildlife enclosure. (d) "Commercial wildlife enclosure" means any privately owned, operated and licensed facility constructed with man-made or man-placed fenced structure, or combination of fencing and terrain features, which must: (i) Contain a minimum of three hundred (300) acres in one (1) contiguous tract of leased or owned land, of which at least 50 percent (50%) of the total enclosed area must contain suitable habitat for white-tailed deer and is not susceptible to flooding; (ii) Be constructed and managed so as to prevent the ingress of native wild animals without providing means of egress for the same. (e) "Exotic livestock" means grass-eating or plant-eating, single-hooved or cloven-hooved mammals that are not indigenous to this state, including non-native cervids, exotic ruminants, non-domestic camelids, non-domestic swine, and other non-native ungulates, including animals from the swine, horse, tapir, rhinoceros, elephant, deer and antelope families raised or maintained in captivity for the production of meat and other products, for sport or for exhibition. SECTION 3.  Section 49-7-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-7-1. For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions and interpretations shall govern unless otherwise provided: (a) The following wild animals are classed as game: bear, white-tailed deer, rabbits and squirrels. (b) The following wild animals are classed as fur-bearing animals:  muskrats, opossums, otters, weasels, minks, raccoons and bobcats. (c) The following wild animals are classed as nuisance animals:  wild hogs, nutria, beaver, fox, skunks and coyote. (d) All freshwater fish in the following families are classed as game fish: Sunfish family (Centrarchidae) - including largemouth bass (Micropterus salmoides), smallmouth bass (Micropterus dolomieu), spotted bass (Micropterus punctulatus), white crappie (Pomoxis annularis), black crappie (Pomoxis nigromaculatus), redear sunfish (Lepomis microlophus), bluegill (Lepomis macrochiris), warmouth (Lepomis gulosus), green sunfish (Lepomis cyanellus), longear sunfish (Lepomis megalotis), redbreast sunfish (Lepomis auritus) and shadow bass (Ambloplites ariommus); Perch family (Percidae) - including walleye (Stizostedion vitreum), sauger (Stizostedion canadense) and yellow perch (Perca flavescens); Pike family (Esocidae) - including redfin pickerel (Esox americanus americanus), grass pickerel (Esox americanus vermiculatus), chain pickerel (Esox niger); Temperate bass family (Moronidae) including - white bass (Morone chrysops), yellow bass (Morone mississippiensis), striped bass (Morone saxatilis) and hybrid striped bass (Morone chrysops x Morone saxatilis and/or Morone saxatilis x Morone chrysops). The following fish are classed as nongame gross fish:  in the Herring family (Clupeidae) - gizzard shad (Dorosoma cepedianum), threadfin shad (Dorosoma petenense); in the Catfish family (Ictaluridae) - channel catfish (Ictalurus punctatus), blue catfish (Ictalurus furcatus), flathead catfish (Pylodictus olivaris), yellow bullhead (Ameiurus natalis), black bullhead (Ameiurus melas), brown bullhead (Ameiurus nebulosus); in the Gar family - spotted gar (Lepisosteus oculatus), longnose gar (Lepisosteus osseus), shortnose gar (Lepisosteus platostomus), alligator gar (Atractosteus spatula); in the Eel family (Anguillidae) - American eel (Anguilla rostrata); in the Bowfin family (Amiidae) - bowfin (Amia calva); in the Paddlefish family (Polyodontidae) - paddlefish (Polyodon spathula); in the Minnow family (Cyprinidae) - common carp (Cyprinus carpio); in the Sucker family (Catostomidae) - river carpsucker (Carpoides carpio), quillback (Carpoides cyprinus), highfin carpsucker (Carpoides velifer), spotted sucker (Minytrema melanops), blacktail redhorse (Moxostoma poecilurum), smallmouth buffalo (Ictiobus bubalus), bigmouth buffalo (Ictiobus cyprinellus), black buffalo (Ictiobus niger); in the Drum family (Sciaenidae) - freshwater drum (Aplodinotus grunniens). All fish native to Mississippi that are not classed as game fish or nongame gross fish are classed as nongame fish. All fish native to foreign countries and all fish native to the United States but not native to Mississippi are classed as nonnative fish. (e) The following are classed as game birds:  geese, brant ducks, rails, coots, snipe, gallinules, moorhens, woodcock, crow, mergansers, wild turkey, quail and doves. All other species of wild resident or migratory birds are classed as nongame birds. (f) Closed season:  the time during which birds, animals or fish may not be taken. (g) Open season:  the time during which birds, animals or fish may be lawfully taken. (h) "Commission" means the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. (i) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. (j) "Executive director" means the Executive Director of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. (k) "Exotic livestock" means grass-eating or plant-eating, single-hooved or cloven-hooved mammals that are not indigenous to this state, including non-native cervids, exotic ruminants, non-domestic camelids, non-domestic swine, and other ungulates, including animals from the swine, horse, tapir, rhinoceros, elephant, deer and antelope families raised or maintained in captivity for the production of meat and other products, for sport or for exhibition. SECTION 4.  Section 49-7-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-7-101. (1)  Unless a different or other penalty or punishment is specially prescribed, a person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter or any law or regulation for the protection of wild animals, birds, or fish, or who fails to perform any duty imposed by such laws or regulations, or who violates or fails to comply with any lawful order, rule or regulation adopted by the commission is guilty of a Class III violation and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).  In addition thereto, such person is liable, in the discretion of the court, to an additional penalty of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each animal, bird, or fish, or part thereof, or each nest or egg of any bird taken, possessed, or transported in violation of such law or regulation. (2) Any person unlawfully killing a doe deer is guilty of a Class II violation and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-143. (3) Any person killing a wild turkey hen, except when permitted by the commission is guilty of a Class II violation and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-143. (4) Any person killing any turkey out of season, and any person baiting turkeys is guilty of a Class II violation and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-143. (5) Any person unlawfully trapping quail or any other game bird within this state is  guilty of a Class II violation and shall be punished as provided in Section 49-7-143. (6) Any person transporting, shipping, or carrying quail or any other game bird within, or from within to a point without this state, without first having secured permission from the executive director to so do, shall, except as otherwise provided by Section 49-1-1 et seq., be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). (7) Any person unlawfully entering a shooting preserve or commercial wildlife enclosure and killing, maiming, wounding or capturing any exotic livestock contained therein is guilty of a Class I violation and shall be punished in accordance as provided in Section 49-7-141(1).  In addition thereto, such person shall: (a) Be guilty of unlawful entry and punished in accordance with Section 49-11-22; (b) Be civilly liable for any damage caused to structure of the shooting preserve or commercial wildlife enclosure when gaining entry thereto; and (c) Make restitution to the operator and owner of the shooting preserve or commercial wildlife enclosure for each exotic animal killed, maimed, wounded or captured. The measure for restitution in money shall be the current replacement value of such loss and/or the actual veterinarian fees, special supplies, loss of income and other costs incurred as a result of the violation. SECTION 5.  Section 49-7-141, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-7-141. (1)  Any person who has been convicted of a Class I violation shall be fined not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and shall be imprisoned in the county jail for five (5) days.  The person shall also forfeit all hunting, trapping and fishing privileges for a period of not less than twelve (12) consecutive months from the date of conviction. (2) In addition to the penalty provided in subsection (1) of this section, any person convicted of a violation of Section 49-7-51 or 49-7-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, may, in the discretion of the court, be fined One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each game animal, game bird or game fish, or part thereof, bought, sold, offered for sale, exchanged for merchandise or other consideration, received for shipment, shipped, transported, carried or possessed with the intent to ship, transport or carry. (3) In addition to the penalty provided in subsection (1) of this section, any person convicted of a violation of Section 49-11-22, involving the unlawful entry into a shooting preserve or commercial wildlife enclosure, shall be civilly liable to the operator of the shooting preserver or commercial wildlife enclosure as prescribed by Section 49-7-101(7). SECTION 6.  Section 97-17-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-17-85. Except as otherwise provided in Sections 73-13-103 * * *and, 49-7-79 and 49-11-22, if any person shall go upon the enclosed land of another without his consent, after having been notified by such person or his agent not to do so, either personally or by published or posted notice, or shall remain on such land after a request by such person or his agent to depart, he shall, upon conviction, be fined not more than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for such offense.  The provisions of this section shall apply to land not enclosed where the stock law is in force. SECTION 7.  Section 97-17-87, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 97-17-87. (1)  Any person who shall be guilty of a willful or malicious trespass upon the real or personal property of another, for which no other penalty is prescribed, shall, upon conviction, be fined not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned not longer than six (6) months in the county jail, or both. (2) (a)  Any person who shall willfully trespass upon any air operations area or sterile area of an airport serving the general public shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned in the county jail for up to one (1) year, or both. (b) For the purposes of this subsection (2), "air operations area" means a portion of an airport designed and used for landing, taking off, or surface maneuvering of airplanes; "sterile area" means an area to which access is controlled by the inspection of persons and property in accordance with an approved security program. SECTION 8.  Section 69-29-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 69-29-1.  (1)  (a)  There is established the Mississippi Agricultural and Livestock Theft Bureau. (b)  The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce shall appoint a director of the Mississippi Agricultural and Livestock Theft Bureau.  Such director shall have at least five (5) years of  law enforcement experience.  Such director shall be responsible solely to the supervision of the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce and to no other person or entity.  Such director may be discharged only for just cause shown. (c)  The director may employ twelve (12) agricultural and livestock theft investigators.  Each investigator shall be certified as a law enforcement officer, successfully completing at least a nine-week training course, in accordance with Section 45-6-11. The curriculum for the training of constables shall not be sufficient for meeting the certification requirements of this paragraph.  In the selection of investigators under this section, preference shall be given to persons who have previous law enforcement experience. (d)  The director appointed under this section, under the direction, control and supervision of the commissioner, and the investigators employed under this section shall perform only the duties described in subsection (2) of this section and shall not be assigned any other duties. (2)  The director appointed under this section and the investigators employed under this section shall have the following powers, duties and authority: (a)  To enforce all of the provisions of Sections 69-29-9 and 69-29-11, and particularly those portions requiring persons transporting livestock to have a bill of sale in their possession; to make investigations of violations of such sections and to arrest persons violating same; (b)  To enforce all of the laws of this state enacted for the purpose of preventing the theft of livestock, poultry, timber and agricultural, aquacultural and timber products and implements; to make investigations of violations thereof and to arrest persons violating same; (c)  To cooperate with all regularly constituted law enforcement officers relative to the matters herein set forth; (d)  To serve warrants and other process emanating from any court of lawful jurisdiction, including search warrants, in all matters herein set forth; (e)  To carry proper credentials evidencing their authority, which shall be exhibited to any person making demand therefor; (f)  To make arrests without warrant in all matters herein set forth in cases where same is authorized under the constitutional and general laws of this state; (g)  To handle the registration of brands of cattle and livestock; (h)  To investigate, prevent, apprehend and arrest those persons anywhere in the state who are violating any of the laws administered by the Department of Agriculture and Commerce, including, but not limited to, all agriculture-related crimes; (i)  To access and examine records of any person, business or entity that harvests, loads, carries, receives or manufactures timber products as defined in this section. Each such person or entity shall permit the director or any investigator of the Mississippi Agricultural and Livestock Theft Bureau to examine records of the sale, transfer or purchase of timber or timber products, including, but not limited to, contracts, load tickets, settlement sheets, drivers' logs, invoices, checks and any other records or documents related to an ongoing investigation of the Mississippi Agricultural and Livestock Theft Bureau; (j)  To conduct training for law enforcement regarding laws enforced by the bureau and to assist any other law enforcement agencies in responding to matters that may be related to agriculture and commerce in the State of Mississippi and in cases of natural disasters or other disasters to respond as needed or as requested by other agencies; and (k)  To maintain a registry of reports of stolen agriculture-related vehicles. (3)  The Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce shall furnish such investigators with such vehicles, equipment and supplies as may be necessary.  All expenses of same, and all other expenses incurred in the administration of this section, shall be paid from such appropriation as may be made by the Legislature. (4)  The Mississippi Department of Revenue and its agents and employees shall cooperate with such investigators by furnishing to them information as to any possible or suspected violations of any of the laws mentioned herein, including specifically Section 69-29-27, and in any other lawful manner. (5)  The conservation officers of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks are authorized to cooperate with and assist the agricultural and livestock theft investigators in the enforcement and apprehension of violators of laws regarding agricultural and livestock theft. (6)  The Mississippi Forestry Commission employees are excluded from any timber and timber products theft investigative responsibilities except when technical expertise is needed and requested through the State Forester or his designee. (7)  For the purposes of this section, "timber product" means timber of all kinds, species or sizes, including, but not limited to, logs, lumber, poles, pilings, posts, blocks, bolts, cordwood and pulpwood, pine stumpwood, pine knots or other distillate wood, crossties, turpentine (crude gum), pine straw, firewood and all other products derived from timber or trees that have a sale or commercial value. SECTION 9.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.